el: Τύπος εργαλείου παιχνιδιού: Τρυπάνι; Σφυρί; Pilers; Πριόνι; Κατσαβίδι; Σετ εργαλείων; Άλλο
zh-TW: 玩具工具類型: 鑽頭; 錘紋; 堆疊機; 鋸; 螺絲起子; 工具組; 其他
vi: Loại dụng cụ đồ chơi: Mũi khoan; Búa; Máy đóng cọc; Lưỡi cưa; Tua vít; Bộ dụng cụ; Khác
de: Spielzeugwerkzeugtyp: Bohrer; Hammer; Stapelmaschinen; Säge; Schraubendreher; Werkzeugsatz; Sonstiges
en: Toy tool type: Drill; Hammer; Pilers; Saw; Screwdriver; Tool set; Other
sl-SI: Vrsta igrače orodja: Vrtalnik; Kladivo; Klešče; Žaga; Izvijač; Set orodij; Drugo
es: Tipo de herramienta de juguete: Taladro; Martillo; Apiladores; Sierra; Destornillador; Juego de herramientas; Otros
th: ประเภทของเครื่องมือของเล่น: สว่าน; ค้อน; คีม; เลื่อย; ไขควง; ชุดเครื่องมือ; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tip unealtă de jucărie: Burghiu; Ciocan; Clește; Ferăstrău; Șurubelniță; Set de scule; Altele
ru: Тип игрушечного инструмента: Дрель; Молоток; Плоскогубцы; Пила; Отвертка; Набор инструментов; Другое
pl: Rodzaj narzędzia do zabawy: Wiertło; Młotek; Kombinerki; Piła; Śrubokręt; Zestaw narzędzi; Inne
nl: Type speelgoedgereedschap: Boor; Hamer; Tang; Zaag; Schroevendraaier; Gereedschapsset; Andere
pt-PT: Tipo de ferramenta de brincar: Broca; Martelo; Alicate; Serra; Chave de fendas; Conjunto de ferramentas; Outro
fi: Lelutyökalutyyppi: Pora; Vasara; Pihdit; Saha; Ruuvitaltta; Työkalusetit; Muu
it: Tipo di strumento giocattolo: Trapano; Martello; Pinze; Sega; Cacciavite; Set di attrezzi; Altro
fr: Type d’outil jouet: Perceuse; Marteau; Pinces; Scie; Tournevis; Ensemble d’outils; Autre
zh-CN: 玩具工具类型: 钻机; 锤纹; 夹钳; 锯子; 螺丝刀; 工具套装; 其他
ja: 玩具ツールタイプ: ドリル; ハンマー; 杭打ち機; のこぎり; ドライバー; 工具セット; その他
tr: Oyuncak alet tipi: Matkap; Çekiç; Kazıklar; Testere; Tornavida; Alet Takımları; Diğer
nb: Lekeverktøytype: Bor; Hammer; Pilers; Sag; Skrutrekker; Verktøysett; Annet
lt-LT: Žaislinio įrankio tipas: Gręžtuvas; Plaktukas; Replės; Pjūklas; Atsuktuvas; Įrankių rinkinys; Kita
ko: 장난감 도구 타입: 드릴; 해머; 파일러; 톱날; 스크루드라이버; 공구 세트; 기타
sv: Typ av leksaksverktyg: Borr; Hammare; Pilers; Såg; Skruvmejsel; Verktygsset; Övrigt
cs: Typ nástroje na hraní: Vrtačka; Kladivo; Kleště; Pilka; Šroubovák; Sada nářadí; Jiné
pt-BR: Tipo de ferramenta de brinquedo: Furadeira; Martelo; Empilhadores; Serra; Chave de fenda; Conjunto de ferramentas; Outro
sk-SK: Typ hračkárskeho náradia: Vŕtačka; Kladivový; Kliešte; Pílka; Skrutkovač; Sada nástrojov; Iné
hr-HR: Vrsta dječjeg alata: Bušilica; Čekić; Kliješta; Pila; Odvijač; Komplet alata; Ostalo
hu: Játékszerszám típusa: Fúró; Kalapács; Cölöpök; Fűrész; Csavarhúzó; Szerszámkészlet; Egyéb
da: Type af legetøjsværktøj: Bor; Hammer; Pilere; Sav; Skruetrækker; Værktøjssæt; Andet
bg-BG: Тип инструмент-играчка: Бормашина; Чук; Клещи; Трион; Отвертка; Комплект инструменти; Други